Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 3

Tennessee Condominium Act of 2008 — Units and Allocation of Common and Limited Elements

66-27-301. Creation of condominium.

A condominium may be created pursuant to part 2, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed. The declaration shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located, and shall be indexed in the grantee's index in the name of the condominium and the association and in the grantor's index in the name of each person executing the declaration. The name and address of the preparer shall appear as required by § 66-24-115.

A residential unit that shares a horizontal boundary with another unit, other than a unit that is subject to retained development rights, may not be conveyed to a purchaser until all structural components and mechanical systems of all buildings containing or comprising the unit are substantially completed.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1; 2015, ch. 356, § 3.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment to (a) deleted “on the first page of the declaration,” following “shall appear”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 356, § 4. May 4, 2015.

66-27-302. Unit boundaries.

Except as provided by the declaration:

If walls, floors or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, all lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, finished flooring, and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces of the walls, floor or ceilings are a part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements;

If any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or any other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion of the chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or other fixture serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated solely to that unit, and any portion of the chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or other fixture serving more than one (1) unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements;

Subject to subdivision (2), all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit; and

Any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, patios, and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit, but located outside the unit's boundaries, are limited common elements allocated exclusively to that unit.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-303. Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable.

The rule against perpetuities may not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, or the bylaws, rules, or regulations adopted pursuant to § 66-27-402(a)(1).

In the event of a conflict between the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails except to the extent the declaration is inconsistent with part 2, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter.

Title to a unit and common elements is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with part 2, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter. Whether a substantial failure impairs marketability is not affected by part 2, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-304. Description of units.

A description of a unit that sets forth the name of the condominium, the recording data for the declaration, the county in which the condominium is located, and the identifying number of the unit, is a sufficient legal description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit that were created by the declaration or bylaws.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-305. Contents of declaration.

The declaration for a condominium must contain:

The name of the condominium, which must include the word “condominium” or be followed by the words “a condominium”, and the association;

The name of every county in which any part of the condominium is situated;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the condominium, including a recital pursuant to § 66-24-110;

A description of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit's identifying number;

A description of any limited common elements, other than those specified in § 66-27-302(2) and (4), as provided in § 66-27-309(b)(10);

A description of any real estate, except real estate subject to development rights, that may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in § 66-27-302(2) and (4), together with a statement that they may be so allocated;

A description of any development rights and other special declarant rights as defined by § 66-27-203, reserved by the declarant; provided, that, prior to the exercise of any such rights, no consent or joinder by the holder of the right to the termination of the condominium shall be required;

If any development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate, a statement to that effect, together with a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and regulating the order in which those portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right; provided, that, if the declaration does not provide that the right must be exercised at a specific time, in a particular order, or with respect to all of the real estate, then the right may be exercised at any time, in any order, or with respect to any portion of the real estate;

Any conditions or limitations under which the rights described in subdivision (a)(7) may be exercised or will lapse;

An allocation to each unit of the allocated interests in the manner described in § 66-27-307;

Any restrictions on use, occupancy, and alienation of the units; and

All matters required by §§ 66-27-306, 66-27-307, 66-27-308, 66-27-309, 66-27-315, 66-27-316, and 66-27-403(c).

The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant deems appropriate.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-306. Leasehold condominiums.

Any lease, the expiration or termination of which may terminate the condominium or reduce its size, shall be recorded. The declaration for the condominium shall state:

The recording data;

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

Any right of the unit owners to acquire the fee simple estate and the manner whereby those rights may be exercised, or a statement that they do not have those rights;

Any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that they do not have those rights; and

Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any renewal, or a statement that they do not have those rights.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium is recorded, neither the lessor nor the lessor's successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who makes timely payment of the unit owner’s share of the rent and otherwise complies with all covenants that, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. A unit owner's leasehold interest is not affected by failure of any other person to pay rent or fulfill any other covenant; provided, that, this subsection (b) shall not prohibit the lessor from acquiring the interest of the defaulting owner, subject to the declaration.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests, unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a condominium, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with § 66-27-207(a) as though those units had been taken by eminent domain. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

Unless the lease described in subsection (a) includes covenants for the benefit of unit owners as set forth in subsections (b) and (c), the lessor under the lease must sign the declaration for the limited purpose of affirming that the lease is subject to those covenants.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-307. Allocation of common element interests, votes, and common expense liabilities.

The declaration shall allocate a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association, and a portion of the votes in the association, to each unit and state the formulas or methods used to establish those allocations. Those allocations may not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, the declaration must state the formulas or methods to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all units included in the condominium after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide:

That different allocations of votes shall be made to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration;

For cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the board of directors; and

For class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class.

A declarant may not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by part 2, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter, nor may units constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements and common expense liabilities allocated at any time to all the units must each equal one (1) if stated as fractions or one hundred percent (100%) if stated as percentages. In the event of discrepancy between an allocated interest and the result derived from application of the pertinent formula or method, the allocated interest prevails.

The common elements are not subject to partition, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements made without the unit to which that interest is allocated, is void.

Any common elements that may be licensed by the declarant pursuant to § 66-27-203(12)(D) shall be described in the declaration. The declaration shall also provide a method of equitably allocating the common expenses attributable to the common elements to the declarant, and assessing the expenses to the declarant or the holder of such rights. The association shall have a lien on the rights to secure payment of the expenses in accordance with § 66-27-415.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-308. Allocation of limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in § 66-27-302(2) and (4), the declaration shall specify either:

To which unit or units each limited common element is allocated; or

Which common elements or limited common elements may be allocated or licensed by conveyance from the declarant.

The allocation may not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

Except as the declaration otherwise provides, and subject to approval by the association, a limited common element may be reallocated by an instrument executed by the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made, and by the association. The instrument shall be prepared and recorded by the association at the expense of the reallocating unit owners. The instrument shall be recorded in the names of the parties and the condominium.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may not be so allocated except pursuant to provisions in the declaration made in accordance with § 66-27-305(a)(6). The allocations shall be made by amendments to the declaration.

Any limited common elements that may be licensed by the declarant pursuant to § 66-27-203(12)(D) shall be described in the declaration. The declaration shall also provide a method of equitably allocating the common expenses attributable to the limited common elements to the declarant, and assessing the expenses to the declarant or the holder of such rights. The association shall have a lien on the rights to secure payment of the expenses in accordance with § 66-27-415.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-309. Plats and plans.

Plats and plans are a part of the declaration. Separate plats and plans are not required by part 2, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter if all the information required by this section is contained in either a plat or plan. Each plat and plan must be clear and legible and must contain all information required by this section. The plat or plan, or both, can be attached to the declaration and incorporated in the declaration, or it or they may be referenced in the declaration and recorded in a plat book at the appropriate register's office. In either event, the plat or plats, plan or plans, or both, shall be deemed acceptable for recording without further action if it or they comply with this section. Each plat or plan must be clear and legible and contain a certification that the plat or plan contains all information required by this section.

Each plat must show:

The name and a survey or general schematic map of the entire condominium;

The location and dimensions of all real estate not subject to development rights, or subject only to the development right to withdraw, and the location of all existing improvements within that real estate;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate subject to development rights, labeled to identify the rights applicable to each parcel;

The extent of any encroachments by or upon any portion of the condominium;

To the extent feasible, a legally sufficient description of all easements serving or burdening any portion of the condominium;

The location and dimensions of any vertical unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (d) and that unit's identifying number;

The location, with reference to an established datum, floor number, elevation, or other appropriate means of designation of any horizontal unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (d) and that unit's identifying number;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years, labeled as “leasehold real estate”;

The distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the condominium; and

Limited common elements, consisting of porches, balconies and patios.

A plat may also show the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvement to be constructed anywhere within the condominium. Any contemplated improvement shown must be built or labeled “NEED NOT BE BUILT”.

To the extent not shown or projected on the plats or disclosed in the declaration, plans of the units must show or project:

The location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit, and that unit's identifying number;

Any horizontal unit boundaries, either by floor number, elevation, or other appropriate means of designation, and that unit's identifying number; and

To the extent not disclosed in the declaration, any units in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements pursuant to § 66-27-310(c), identified appropriately.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the horizontal boundaries of part of a unit located outside of a building have the same elevation as the horizontal boundaries of the inside part, and need not be depicted on the plats and plans.

Upon exercising any development right, the declarant shall record either new plats and plans necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (a), (b) and (d), or new certifications of plats and plans previously recorded if those plats and plans otherwise conform to the requirements of subsections (a), (b) and (d).

Any certification of a plat or plan required by this section must be made and signed in original by an independent, registered surveyor, architect or engineer, or combination of independent, registered surveyor, architect and engineer.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-310. Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under § 66-27-305(a)(7), the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration pursuant to § 66-27-317 and comply with § 66-27-309. The declarant is the unit owner of any units thereby created. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created, and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in subsection (b), reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment must describe any common elements and any limited common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by § 66-27-308.

Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the condominium if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by § 66-27-305 or § 66-27-306, as the case may be, and the plats and plans include all matters required by § 66-27-309. This subsection (b) does not extend any time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration.

Whenever a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units or common elements, or both:

If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain pursuant to § 66-27-207.

If the declarant subdivides the unit into two (2) or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration provides, pursuant to § 66-27-305(a)(7), that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal:

If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

If a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no portion may be withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-311. Alterations of units.

Subject to the declaration and other law, a unit owner:

May make any improvements or alterations to the unit owner's unit that do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium;

May not change the appearance of the common elements, or the exterior appearance of a unit or any other portion of the condominium, without permission of the association; and

After acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, may remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures in the intervening partition, even if the partition, in whole or in part, is a common element, if those acts do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this subdivision (3) is not an alteration of boundaries. The owner of any adjoining unit affected by the removal of partitions or creation of apertures shall have the right to restore the removed partitions to their original condition or to close any apertures created.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-312. Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the declaration and other law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of those units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their allocated interests, the application must state the proposed reallocations. Unless the board of directors determines within thirty (30) days that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment, at the expense of the affected unit owners, that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those unit owners and the association, to evidence compliance with this subsection (a), contains words of conveyance between the affected unit owners, and upon recordation, is indexed in the name of the grantor and the grantee.

The association shall prepare and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers, at the expense of the applicant owners.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-313. Subdivision of units.

In addition to any development rights relating to the subdivision of units that may be reserved to the declarant, if the declaration expressly so permits, a unit owner may subdivide a unit into two (2) or more units. Subject to the declaration and other law, upon application of a unit owner to subdivide a unit, the association shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration, including the plats and plans, subdividing that unit, at the expense of the owner of the unit to be subdivided.

The amendment to the declaration must be executed by the owner of the unit to be subdivided, assign an identifying number to each unit created, and reallocate the allocated interests formerly allocated to the subdivided unit to the new units in any reasonable manner prescribed by the owner of the subdivided unit.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-314. Monuments as boundaries.

The existing physical boundaries of a unit or the physical boundaries of a unit reconstructed in substantial accordance with the original plats and plans of the unit become its boundaries rather than the metes and bounds expressed in the deed or plat or plan, regardless of settling or lateral movement of the building, or minor variance between boundaries shown on the plats or plans or in the deed and those of the building. This section does not relieve a unit owner of liability in case of the owner's willful misconduct nor relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to the plats and plans.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-315. Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices, and models in units owned by the declarant. The declarant may maintain sales offices on common elements in the condominium only if the declaration so provides and specifies the rights of a declarant with regard to the sales offices. Any sales office, management office, or model not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element, and if a declarant ceases to be a unit owner or holder of a development right to create additional units, the declarant ceases to have any rights with regard to the units or in any personal property owned by the declarant and used in connection with the units, unless it is removed from the condominium after notice from the association specifying a reasonable period for the removal. Subject to any limitations in the declaration, a declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the condominium. Any rights reserved to the declarant under this section may be exercised by an agent of the declarant. This section is subject to other state law and local ordinances.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-316. Easement rights.

Subject to the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging the declarant's obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under part 1, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter or reserved in the declaration.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-317. Amendment of declaration.

Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under § 66-27-309(f) or § 66-27-310, the association under § 66-27-207, § 66-27-306(d), § 66-27-308(c), § 66-27-312(a), or § 66-27-313, or certain unit owners under § 66-27-308(b), § 66-27-312(a), § 66-27-313(b), or § 66-27-318(b), and except as limited by subsections (d) or (e) of this section, the declaration, including the plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or any larger majority the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

No action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section may be brought more than one (1) year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located, and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment shall be indexed in the grantee's index in the name of the condominium and the association and in the grantor's index in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by part 1, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter, no amendment may change the boundaries of any unit, or the allocated interests of a unit, or prohibit the leasing of any unit, in the absence of the consent of all affected unit owners.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by part 1, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter, no amendment may increase special declarant rights without the consent of sixty-seven percent (67%) of the votes of the association other than the declarant.

Amendments to the declaration required by part 1, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of designation, by the president of the association.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-318. Termination of condominium.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain pursuant to § 66-27-207, a condominium may be terminated only by agreement of unit owners of units to which at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association are allocated, and eighty percent (80%) of those lenders having first mortgage liens on any unit or units to which eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association are allocated. The declaration may specify a larger percentage in either instance, and may specify that a lender is deemed to approve the termination if notice is sent to the last address of that lender on file with the association, or if none, as specified in the lender's first mortgage lien of record, and no objection is received within thirty (30) days thereafter. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the condominium are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

An agreement to terminate must be evidenced by the execution of a termination agreement, or ratifications of a termination agreement, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination agreement may specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless it is recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all ratifications of the termination agreement must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.

In the case of a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all the common elements and units of the condominium shall be sold following termination. If, pursuant to the agreement, any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, the termination agreement must set forth the minimum terms of the sale.

In the case of a condominium containing any units that include title to the underlying land as provided in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements, but may not require that the units be sold following termination, unless the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or unless all owners of units to be sold consent to the sale.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract for the sale of real estate in the condominium, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b). If any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, title to that real estate, upon termination, vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the units. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds thereof distributed, the association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination. Proceeds of the sale must be distributed to unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear, in proportion to the respective interests of unit owners as provided in subsection (h). Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, as long as the association holds title to the real estate, each unit owner and each unit owner's successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted each unit owner’s unit. During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner and each unit owner’s successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit owners by part 1, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter or the declaration.

If the real estate constituting the condominium is not to be sold following termination, title to the common elements and, in a condominium containing only units not including title to the underlying land as described in the declaration, title to all the real estate in the condominium vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection (h), and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common exists, each unit owner and each unit owner's successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted each unit owner’s unit.

Following termination of the condominium, the proceeds of any sale of real estate, together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear. Following termination, creditors of the association holding liens on the units that were recorded before termination may enforce those liens in the same manner as any lienholder. All other creditors of the association are to be treated as if they had perfected liens on the units immediately before termination.

The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (e), (f) and (g) are as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision (h)(2), the respective interests of unit owners are the fair market values of their units, limited common elements, and common element interests immediately before the termination, as determined by one (1) or more independent appraisers selected by the association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the unit owners and becomes final unless disapproved within thirty (30) days after distribution by unit owners of units to which at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any unit owner's interest to that of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner's unit and common element interest by the total fair market values of all the units and common elements; and

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of the fair market value of the unit or any limited common element before destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are their respective common element interests immediately before the termination.

If a lien or encumbrance against all or any portion of the real estate comprising the condominium has priority over the declaration, and the lien or encumbrance has been released with respect to any unit, then the lien or encumbrance shall be deemed subordinate to the declaration.

Notwithstanding subdivision (i)(1), foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not of itself withdraw that real estate from the condominium, but the person taking title to the real estate has the right to require from the association an amendment excluding the real estate from the condominium, upon request and payment of the expense of the amendment.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-319. Rights of secured lenders.

The declaration may require that all or a specified number or percentage of the mortgagees or beneficiaries of deeds of trust encumbering the units approve specified actions of the unit owners or the association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions, but no requirement for approval may operate to deny or delegate control over the general administrative affairs of the association by the unit owners or the board of directors, or prevent the association or the board of directors from commencing, intervening in, or settling any litigation or proceeding, or receiving and distributing any insurance proceeds except pursuant to §66-27-413.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-320. Obligation to complete or restore.

The declarant or unit owner or owners, as applicable, shall promptly repair and restore, to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium, any portion of the condominium affected by the exercise of rights reserved or created by §§66-27-310 —66-27-313,66-27-315 and66-27-316.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-321. Master associations.

If the declaration for a condominium provides that any of the powers described in § 66-27-402 are to be exercised by or may be delegated to a profit or nonprofit corporation, or unincorporated association, that exercises those or other powers on behalf of one (1) or more condominiums or for the benefit of the unit owners of one (1) or more condominiums, all provisions of part 1, this part and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter applicable to unit owners' associations apply to any such corporation, or unincorporated association, except as modified by this section.

Unless a master association is acting in the capacity of an association described in § 66-27-401, it may exercise the powers set forth in § 66-27-402(a)(2) only to the extent expressly permitted in the declarations of condominiums that are part of the master association or expressly described in the delegations of power from those condominiums to the master association.

If the declaration of any condominium provides that the board of directors may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the board of directors have no liability for the acts or omissions of the master association with respect to those powers following delegation.

The rights and responsibilities of unit owners with respect to the unit owners' association set forth in §§ 66-27-403, 66-27-408 — 66-27-410 and 66-27-412 apply in the conduct of the affairs of a master association only to those persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are otherwise unit owners within the meaning of part 1, this part, and parts 4 and 5 of this chapter.

Notwithstanding § 66-27-403(f) with respect to the election of the board of directors of an association, by all unit owners after the period of declarant control ends, and even if a master association is also an association described in § 66-27-401, the certificate of incorporation or other instrument creating the master association and the declaration of each condominium, the powers of which are assigned by the declaration or delegated to the master association, may provide that the board of directors of the master association must be elected after the period of declarant control in any of the following ways:

All unit owners of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that board of directors;

All members of the board of directors of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that board of directors;

All unit owners of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that board of directors; or

All members of the board of directors of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that board of directors.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.